Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB220.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 38-612 is hereby amended to read as follows: 38-
612. That (a) Any person, firm or corporation employing any person or
child in violation of any provision of this act, or permitting or conniving at
such violation, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon
conviction thereof shall be fined in a sum not less than twenty-five dollars
nor more than one hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail
for a period of not less than thirty days nor more than ninety days:
(1) Class A person misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections
(a)(2) and (a)(3);
(2) severity level 7, person felony upon a second conviction; and
(3) severity level 5, person felony upon a third or subsequent
conviction.
(b) In addition to any other criminal penalties provided by law, any
person convicted of a violation of this section for a second time shall pay a
fine in an amount of $25,000 and any person convicted of a violation of
this section for a third or subsequent time shall pay a fine in an amount of
$50,000.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 38-612 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.